Utah statutes.
10-8-17.   City may act as distributing agent -- Collection of operating costs from users.

When the governing body of a city is acting as distributing agent of water, not the property of the corporation, outside of or within its corporate limits, the governing body may annually prior to the commencement of the irrigation season determine and fix the sum deemed necessary to meet the expense of the current year for the purpose of controlling, regulating and distributing such water and constructing and keeping in repair the necessary means for diverting, conveying and distributing the same, and they may collect such sum from the persons entitled to the use of such water, pro rata according to acreage, whether the acreage is situate within or without the corporate boundary of the city; provided, that the funds so derived may not be appropriated or used for any other purpose, and in the event that a greater sum is collected in any one year than is necessary for said purpose, the excess thereof shall be carried to the account of the year next following and applied to the purpose for which it was collected.  Such sum shall be fixed and collected as provided by ordinance, and until collected the same shall be a lien on such water rights and the land irrigated thereby.



Amended by Chapter 378, 2010 General Session

